Vermont statutes. Title 33 Human Services
Chapter 53. Children in Need of Care or Supervision
§ 5319.
Parent-child contact and contact with siblings and relatives.

The court shall order parent-child contact unless the court finds that it is necessary to deny parent-child contact because the protection of the physical safety or emotional well-being of the child so requires. Except for good cause shown, the order shall be consistent with any existing parent-child contact order.

The court may determine the reasonable frequency and duration of parent-child contact and may set such conditions for parent-child contact as are in the child’s best interests, including whether parent-child contact should be unsupervised or supervised. The court may allocate the costs of supervised visitation.

Parent-child contact may be modified by stipulation or upon motion of a party or upon the court’s own motion pursuant to section 5113 of this title.

The court may terminate a parent-child contact order in a juvenile proceeding upon a finding that:

a parent has without good cause failed to maintain a regular schedule of contact with the child and that the parent’s failure to exercise regular contact has had a detrimental impact on the emotional well-being of the child; or

continued parent-child contact in accordance with the terms of the prior order will have a detrimental impact on the physical or emotional well-being of the child.

Upon motion of the child’s attorney, the court may also order contact between the child and the child’s siblings, an adult relative with whom the child has a significant relationship, or an adult friend with whom the child has a significant relationship.

Failure to provide parent-child contact due to the child’s illness or other good cause shall not constitute grounds for a contempt or enforcement proceeding against the Department.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5320.
Postdisposition review hearing.

The court shall hold a review hearing within 60 days of the date of the disposition order for the purpose of monitoring progress under the disposition case plan and reviewing parent-child contact. Notice of the review shall be provided to all parties. A foster parent, preadoptive parent, relative caregiver, or any custodian of the child shall be provided with notice of any post disposition review hearings and an opportunity to be heard at the hearings. Nothing in this section shall be construed as affording such person party status in the proceeding. This section shall not apply to cases where full custody has been returned to one or both parents unconditionally at disposition, or cases where the court has created a permanent guardianship at disposition. The Department shall, and any other party or caregiver may, prepare a written report to the court regarding progress under the plan of services specified in the disposition case plan.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2009; amended

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.

§ 5320a.
Duration of conditional custody orders postdisposition.

Conditional custody orders to parents. Whenever the court issues a conditional custody order transferring custody to a parent either at or following disposition, the presumptive duration of the order shall be no more than six months from the date of the disposition order or the conditional custody order, whichever occurs later, unless otherwise extended by the court after hearing. At least 14 days prior to the termination of the order, any party may file a request to extend the order pursuant to subsection 5113(b) of this title. Upon such motion, the court may extend the order for an additional period of time not to exceed six months. Prior to vacating the conditional custody order, the court may schedule a hearing on its own motion to review the case prior to discharging the conditions. If a motion to extend is not filed, the court shall issue an order vacating the conditions and transferring full custody to the parent without conditions.

Custody orders to nonparents.

When the court at disposition issues an order continuing or transferring legal custody with a nonparent pursuant to subdivision 5318(a)(2) or (a)(7) of this title, the court shall set the matter for a hearing six months from the date of disposition or custody order, whichever occurs later. At the hearing, the court shall determine whether it is in the best interests of the child to:

transfer either full or conditional custody of the child to a parent;

establish a permanent guardianship pursuant to

14 V.S.A. § 2664

with the nonparent who has had custody of the child as the guardian; or

terminate residual parental rights and release the child for adoption.

If, after hearing, the court determines that reasonable progress has been made toward reunification and that reunification is in the best interests of the child but will require additional time, the court may extend the current order for a period not to exceed six months and set the matter for further hearing.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 170

(Adj. Sess.), § 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2016.

§ 5321.
Permanency hearing.

Purpose. Unless otherwise specified therein, an order under the authority of this chapter transferring legal custody or residual parental rights and responsibilities of a child to the Department pursuant to subdivision 5318(a)(4) or (5) of this title shall be for an indeterminate period and shall be subject to periodic review at a permanency hearing. At the permanency hearing, the court shall determine the permanency goal for the child and an estimated time for achieving that goal. The goal shall specify when:

legal custody of the child will be transferred to the parent, guardian, or custodian;

the child will be released for adoption;

a permanent guardianship will be established for the child;

a legal guardianship will be established for the child pursuant to an order under 14 V.S.A. chapter 111; or

the child will remain in the same living arrangement or be placed in another planned permanent living arrangement because the Commissioner has demonstrated to the satisfaction of the court a compelling reason that it is not in the child’s best interests to:

return home;

have residual parental rights terminated and be released for adoption; or

be placed with a fit and willing relative or legal guardian.

The court shall adopt a case plan designed to achieve the permanency goal. At the permanency review, the court shall review the permanency plan and determine whether the plan advances the permanency goal recommended by the Department. The court may accept or reject the plan, but may not designate a particular placement for a child in the Department’s legal custody.

A permanency review hearing shall be held no less than every 12 months with the first hearing to be held 12 months after the date the legal custody of the child was transferred, subject to the following exceptions:

If the child was three years of age or younger at the time of the initial transfer of legal custody, the court may order that permanency review hearings be held as frequently as every three months.

If the child is between the ages of three and six at the time of the initial transfer of legal custody, the court may order that permanency review hearings be held as frequently as every six months.

If the court shortens the time for the permanency review hearing for a younger sibling, that shortened review interval shall be applied to all siblings in the family who are in the legal custody of the Department.

The Department shall file with the court a notice of permanency review together with a case plan and recommendation for a permanency goal. The Department shall provide notice to the State’s Attorney having jurisdiction and to all parties to the proceeding in accordance with the rules for family proceedings. The court shall hold a permanency review hearing within 30 days of the filing of notice by the Department. Failure to give such notice or to review an order shall not terminate the original order or limit the court’s jurisdiction.
(e) (1) The Department shall file with the court a notice of permanency review together with a case plan and recommendation for a permanency goal. The Department shall provide notice to the State’s Attorney having jurisdiction and to all parties to the proceeding in accordance with the rules for family proceedings. The court shall hold a permanency review hearing within 30 days of the filing of notice by the Department. Failure to give such notice or to review an order shall not terminate the original order or limit the court’s jurisdiction.

A foster parent, preadoptive parent, or relative caregiver for the child shall be provided notice of and an opportunity to be heard at any permanency hearing held with respect to the child. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as affording such person party status in the proceeding.

All evidence helpful in determining the questions presented, including hearsay, may be admitted and relied upon to the extent of its probative value even though not competent at an adjudication hearing.

The permanency hearing may be held by an administrative body appointed or approved by the court. The administrative body may consist of one but not more than three persons. No person employed by the Department shall be a member of the administrative body. In the event that the administrative body determines that the existing order should be altered, it shall submit its recommendation to the court for its consideration. In the event that the administrative body determines that the existing order should not be altered, its determination shall be binding unless any party requests review by the court within 10 days of receipt of the determination. A copy of the determination shall be sent to each party and to the court. The court, on its own motion or on the request of any party, shall conduct a review de novo within 30 days of receipt of such request.

Upon the filing of a petition for a finding of reasonable efforts and a report or affidavit by the Department for Children and Families with notice to all parties, the court shall hold a hearing within 30 days of the filing of the petition to determine, by a preponderance of the evidence, whether the Department for Children and Families has made reasonable efforts to finalize the permanency plan for the child that is in effect at the time of the hearing. The hearing may be consolidated with or separate from a permanency hearing. Reasonable efforts to finalize a permanency plan may consist of:

reasonable efforts to reunify the child and family following the child’s removal from the home, where the permanency plan for the child is reunification; or

reasonable efforts to arrange and finalize an alternate permanent living arrangement for the child, in cases where the permanency plan for the child does not include reunification.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.

§ 5322.
Placement of a child in a facility used for treatment of delinquent children.

A child found by the court to be a child in need of care and supervision shall not be placed in or transferred to an institution used solely for the treatment or rehabilitation of delinquent children unless the child has been charged with or adjudicated as having committed a delinquent act.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2009.